Maine, session 132, LD1754.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 28-A MRSA §1358 is enacted to read:
§1358. Direct shipment of spirits
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Case equivalent" has the same meaning as in section 1457, subsection 1-A,
paragraph B.
B. "Common carrier" means a company that transports goods upon reasonable request,
on regular routes and at set rates.
C. "Direct shipper" means a distillery, small distillery, rectifier or out-of-state spirits
manufacturer that has obtained a spirits direct shipper license under subsection 2.
D. "Direct shipper discount rate" means a percentage that is equal to the percentage
discount rate for small distilleries that sell their products directly to consumers under
section 606, subsection 4-B.
E. "Fulfillment provider" means a bonded logistics agent of a direct shipper that
provides fulfillment services, including warehousing, packaging, distribution and order
processing for the shipment of spirits to a consumer and arranges for transport of spirits
to a consumer by a common carrier and that has obtained a fulfillment provider
registration under subsection 9.
2. Direct shipment of spirits; license required. A distillery, small distillery, rectifier
or out-of-state spirits manufacturer holding a federal basic distilled spirits plant permit that
has been issued a certificate of label approval by the United States Department of the
Treasury, Alcohol and Tobacco Tax and Trade Bureau for a product to be shipped may
obtain a spirits direct shipper license by filing with the bureau an application in a form
determined by the bureau accompanied by an application fee of not more than $200, a copy
of the applicant's current federal basic distilled spirits plant permit and a list of spirits labels
to be shipped in accordance with this section.
3. Direct shipper application. Before sending a shipment to a resident of this State,
a direct shipper shall file an application for a spirits direct shipper license under subsection
2 with the bureau on a form issued by the bureau along with a true copy of its current
distillery, small distillery, rectifier or out-of-state spirits manufacturer license issued in this
State or another state and a $100 registration fee.
4. Direct shipment requirements. A direct shipper or the direct shipper's fulfillment
provider may only ship spirits that were produced by or for the direct shipper, owned by
the direct shipper or sold under the distillery name of the direct shipper in accordance with
the direct shipper's federal basic distilled spirits plant permit to a recipient who is at least
21 years of age and that are intended for personal use and not for resale. A direct shipper
or the direct shipper's fulfillment provider shall label each package to be shipped in
accordance with this section so that it conspicuously reads: "CONTAINS ALCOHOL:
SIGNATURE OF A PERSON 21 YEARS OF AGE OR OLDER IS REQUIRED FOR
DELIVERY."
Page 1 - 132LR1002(01)

5. Common carrier. Shipments made in accordance with this section must be made
by a common carrier and must be accompanied by a shipping label that clearly indicates
the name of the direct shipper and the name and residence address of the recipient. The
common carrier shall obtain the signature of a person 21 years of age or older at the address
listed on the shipping label prior to delivery of the shipment. The common carrier shall
request photographic identification from the person signing for the shipment and verify that
the person is 21 years of age or older.
6. Shipment restrictions and limitations. The following shipment restrictions and
limitations apply to a direct shipper under this section.
A. A direct shipper may ship no more than one case equivalent of spirits per recipient
address in a 3-month period and may not exceed 4 case equivalents of spirits per
recipient address in a calendar year.
B. A direct shipper that is a holder of a small distillery license under section 1355-A
to distill, rectify, blend and bottle more than 50,000 gallons of spirits per year may ship
to recipients in this State only spirits that the direct shipper is licensed to ship under
subsection 2 and that are listed for sale in the State by the commission under section
81, subsection 3. A direct shipper under this paragraph may ship within the State no
more than 60 case equivalents of spirits in a calendar year.
C. A direct shipper other than a direct shipper in paragraph B may ship to a recipient
in this State only spirits that the direct shipper is licensed to ship under subsection 2
and that are not listed for sale in the State by the commission under section 81,
subsection 3. A direct shipper under this paragraph may ship within the State no more
than 60 case equivalents of spirits in a calendar year. If, within a 12-month period, a
direct shipper under this paragraph ships more than 10 case equivalents of a single
spirits product within the State, the direct shipper must request that that spirits product
be listed by the commission under section 81, subsection 3.
D. A direct shipper may not be located in a foreign country.
7. Prohibited shipping areas. A direct shipper may not ship to any address in an area
identified by the bureau as a prohibited shipping area or a local option area under chapter
5.
8. License renewal. A direct shipper may annually renew its spirits direct shipper
license with the bureau by paying a $50 renewal fee and providing the bureau with a true
copy of its current distillery, small distillery, rectifier or out-of-state spirits manufacturer
license issued in this State or another state.
9. Fulfillment provider; registration. A direct shipper may use a fulfillment provider
that is registered under this subsection.
A. A fulfillment provider that is not a common carrier and that does not hold a direct
shipper, manufacturer or retail license issued by the bureau and that is not owned or
controlled by a common carrier, direct shipper, manufacturer or retail licensee may
register with the bureau in a manner prescribed by the bureau. A registration must
include the information required in paragraph B and a registration fee of not more than
$50 per physical premises. A fulfillment provider registering pursuant to this
subsection shall register with the bureau for each physical premises from which the
fulfillment provider will ship spirits under this section. A fulfillment provider may only
Page 2 - 132LR1002(01)

415 ship spirits to a recipient in the State if the fulfillment provider maintains a current
426 registration, as applicable, under this subsection and only if the spirits shipped are
437 provided by a direct shipper licensed under this section.
B. A fulfillment provider registration must include the following:
(1) The address of each premises from which the fulfillment provider will ship
spirits to recipients in the State;
(2) The name, address and license number of each direct shipper on whose behalf
the fulfillment provider will ship spirits to recipients in the State; and
(3) Any other information as determined by the bureau.
C. A fulfillment provider registration must be renewed every 2 years. If there is a
material change in the information provided to the bureau related to the initial
registration or renewal, the fulfillment provider shall provide updated information to
the bureau not later than 14 days after the change.
D. A fulfillment provider shall make all commercially reasonable efforts to verify the
validity of each direct shipper license prior to making any shipments under this section.
Continuous failure to verify the validity of licenses may result in the suspension of the
fulfillment provider's registration and imposition of a fine.
10. Direct shipper spirits pricing. Spirits shipped under this section must be sold at
the retail price determined by the commission pursuant to section 1651, subsection 1.
Spirits shipped under this section by a direct shipper under subsection 6, paragraph C must
be sold at a price equivalent to the retail price for spirits sold to the State with a supplier
price as reported by the direct shipper to the bureau under subsection 13. If the direct
shipper modifies the supplier price from the price reported to the bureau under subsection
13, the direct shipper shall notify the bureau prior to implementing the modified price.
11. Sales tax registration and payment required. A direct shipper shall comply
with the provisions of Title 36, Part 3, including all requirements relating to registration as
a seller and the collection, reporting and remittance of the sales and use taxes of the State,
and a direct shipper located outside the State shall agree to be subject to the jurisdiction of
the State for purposes of the enforcement of those obligations. The requirements of this
subsection apply notwithstanding any provision of law of the State to the contrary.
12. Payment to bureau. A direct shipper shall pay quarterly to the bureau amounts
as follows.
A. A direct shipper under subsection 6, paragraph B shall pay to the bureau the
difference between the direct shipper's price charged to the bureau for that spirits
product and the amount equal to the retail price for that spirits product multiplied by
the direct shipper discount rate.
B. A direct shipper under subsection 6, paragraph C shall pay to the bureau the
difference between the direct shipper's supplier price for that spirits product as reported
to the bureau under subsection 13 and the amount equal to the retail price as determined
under subsection 10 for that spirits product multiplied by the direct shipper discount
rate.
13. Reporting. Reports to the bureau regarding direct shipments of spirits are
governed by this subsection.
Page 3 - 132LR1002(01)

A. A direct shipper shall submit a report to the bureau quarterly in a manner and form
prescribed by the bureau that includes the following:
(1) The total number of case equivalents per spirits product shipped to recipients
in the State and, for a direct shipper located in the State, shipments made outside
the State;
(2) For a direct shipper located outside the State, the supplier price and the
calculated retail price under subsection 10 for each spirits product shipped to
recipients in the State;
(3) The name and residence address of shipment recipients in the State;
(4) The name and registration of the designated fulfillment providers, if applicable;
(5) The common carrier used to deliver each shipment; and
(6) The date, quantity and purchase price of each shipment.
B. A fulfillment provider shall submit a report to the bureau quarterly in a manner and
form prescribed by the bureau that includes the following:
(1) The name as it appears on the direct shipper license, physical address and
license number of the direct shipper on whose behalf the fulfillment provider
shipped spirits under this section;
(2) The date of each shipment;
(3) The name and business address of the common carrier that transported the
shipment and the unique tracking number for each shipment;
(4) The weight of each package shipped; and
(5) The name and residence address of each recipient.
C. A common carrier shall submit a report to the bureau quarterly in a manner and
form prescribed by the bureau that includes the following:
(1) The name of the common carrier;
(2) The name and address of the direct shipper and, if applicable, the fulfillment
provider that used the common carrier for a shipment of spirits;
(3) The name and address of each recipient;
(4) The weight of each package delivered to each recipient;
(5) The unique tracking number for each shipment; and
(6) The date of delivery.
A failure by a common carrier to comply with the reporting requirements of this
paragraph that continues for more than 30 days after receiving from the bureau a notice
of that failure may result in the suspension of the common carrier's license to operate
in the State or the imposition of any other penalty the relevant licensing authority in
the State is authorized to impose.
D. If no spirits were shipped to a recipient in this State and, for a direct shipper that is
a holder of a small distillery license under section 1355-A, no spirits were shipped to a
Page 4 - 132LR1002(01)

319 recipient outside the State during the reporting period, a report indicating such must be
420 submitted to the bureau.
14. Audit and records retention. The bureau may perform an audit of a direct
shipper's, fulfillment provider's or common carrier's records relevant to compliance with
this section. A direct shipper, fulfillment provider or common carrier shall provide copies
of any records requested by the bureau within 20 business days of that request.
A. A direct shipper shall maintain the books, records and documents supporting a
report submitted under subsection 13, paragraph A or D for 2 years after the reporting
date, unless otherwise directed by the bureau.
B. A fulfillment provider shall maintain the books, records and documents supporting
a report submitted under subsection 13, paragraph B or D for 2 years after the reporting
date, unless otherwise directed by the bureau.
C. A common carrier shall maintain the books, records and documents supporting a
report submitted under subsection 13, paragraph C or D, including an electronic or
paper copy of each recipient's signature, for 2 years after the reporting date, unless
otherwise directed by the bureau.
15. Violation. A person, including a common carrier or fulfillment provider, that
knowingly causes a direct shipment in violation of this section is subject to a fine of up to
$500 for a first offense and up to $1,000 for any subsequent violation of this section. A
direct shipper, fulfillment provider or common carrier who knowingly delivers spirits to a
person who has not attained 21 years of age is subject to a fine of up to $5,000. The bureau
may suspend or revoke a spirits direct shipper license under subsection 2 for failure to
comply with the shipping limits and reporting requirements required by this section. The
bureau may accept payment of an offer in compromise in lieu of suspension; such payments
must be determined by rules adopted by the bureau.
16. Jurisdiction. A direct shipper, as a condition of licensure, is subject to the
jurisdiction and enforcement authority of the State for the purposes of enforcement of this
section.
17. Beverage container law. Spirits shipped pursuant to this section are subject to
the provisions of Title 38, chapter 33.
18. Rules. The bureau shall adopt rules to carry out the purposes of this section. Rules
adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter
375, subchapter 2-A.
Sec. 2. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 2026.